Maryland, session 2026, HB0601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–707.
(a) Unless otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver
of a vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of the
intersection at a clearly marked stop line.
(b) Unless otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver
of a vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of the
intersection and, if there is no clearly marked stop line, before entering any crosswalk.
(c) Unless otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver
of a vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of an
– 1 –

Ch. 557 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
intersection and, if there is no crosswalk, at the nearest point before entering the
intersection that gives the driver a view of traffic approaching on the intersecting roadway.
(d) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection at a clearly marked stop
line.
(e) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection and, if there is no clearly
marked stop line, before entering any crosswalk.
(f) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection and, if there is no crosswalk,
at the nearest point before entering the intersection that gives the driver a view of traffic
approaching on the intersecting roadway.
21–707.1.
(a) This section applies only in:
(1) Prince George’s County[, the];
(2) THE 45th and 46th Legislative Districts in Baltimore City[,];
(3) THE CITY OF GAITHERSBURG;
(4) THE CITY OF ROCKVILLE; and [the]
(5) THE City of Takoma Park.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means a law enforcement agency that is authorized to issue a
citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic laws or regulations.
(3) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or lessee
of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle leasing company; or
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 557
(4) “Recorded image” means images recorded by a stop sign monitoring
system:
(i) On:
1. Two or more photographs;
2. Two or more microphotographs;
3. Two or more electronic images;
4. Videotape; or
5. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing a motor vehicle and, on at least one image or portion of
tape, clearly identifying the registration plate number of the motor vehicle.
(5) “Stop sign monitoring system” means a device designed to capture a
recorded image of a violation.
(6) (i) “Violation” means a failure to come to a complete stop at a stop
sign in violation of § 21–707 of this subtitle.
(ii) “Violation” does not include any action a driver is instructed to
take by a police officer.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) through (5) of this subsection, an agency may
use stop sign monitoring systems:
(i) On highways located in a school zone maintained by a local
jurisdiction, if authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction; or
(ii) On State highways located in a school zone, if authorized by the
State Highway Administration.
(2) A stop sign monitoring system:
(i) May not be used in a local jurisdiction under this section unless
its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction by local law enacted
after reasonable notice and a public hearing; and
(ii) In Prince George’s County, may only be used at a location
approved by the Prince George’s County Council.
– 3 –

Ch. 557 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Prince George’s County shall prioritize the placement of stop sign
monitoring systems within municipalities that have high violation rates.
(4) Before beginning use of stop sign monitoring systems, an agency shall
publish notice that the agency has adopted the use of stop sign monitoring systems on its
website and, in Baltimore City and Prince George’s County only, in a newspaper of general
circulation in the jurisdiction in which the stop sign monitoring system will be used.
(5) (i) A local jurisdiction that implements a stop sign monitoring
system shall prominently place signs on highways within the local jurisdiction providing
notice that stop sign monitoring systems are used in the local jurisdiction.
(ii) The State Highway Administration shall place signs prominently
providing notice that stop sign monitoring systems are in use on State highways.
(d) A recorded image under this section indicating that the driver of a motor
vehicle has committed a violation shall include:
(1) The time and date of the violation; and
(2) To the extent possible, the location of the violation.
(e) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(3) or (h)(4)
or (5) of this section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor
vehicle is recorded by a stop sign monitoring system during the commission of a violation.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (f)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(f) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (5) of this
subsection, an agency shall mail to the owner liable under subsection (e) of this section a
citation that shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) The registration plate number of the motor vehicle involved in
the violation;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 557
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) To the extent possible, the location of the violation;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty must be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a technician employed by the agency that,
based on the inspection of the recorded image, the motor vehicle was being operated during
the commission of a violation;
(ix) A statement that the recorded image is evidence of a violation;
and
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section:
1. Of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the
citation may be contested in the District Court; and
2. That failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability
in a timely manner is an admission of liability and may result in refusal or suspension of
the motor vehicle registration.
(2) The agency may mail a warning notice in place of a citation to the owner
liable under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) (i) Before mailing a citation to a motor vehicle rental company liable
under subsection (e) of this section, an agency shall mail a notice to the motor vehicle rental
company stating that a citation will be mailed to the motor vehicle rental company unless,
within 45 days after receiving the notice, the motor vehicle rental company provides the
agency with:
1. A statement made under oath that states the name and
last known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the motor vehicle when the
violation occurred;
2. A. A statement made under oath that states that the
motor vehicle rental company is unable to determine who was driving the vehicle at the
time the violation occurred because the motor vehicle was stolen at the time of the violation;
and
– 5 –

Ch. 557 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. A copy of the police report associated with the motor
vehicle theft claimed under item A of this item; or
3. Payment for the penalty associated with the violation.
(ii) An agency may not mail a citation to a motor vehicle rental
company liable under subsection (e) of this section if the motor vehicle rental company
complies with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(4) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection and subsection
(h)(4) and (5) of this section, a citation issued under this section shall be mailed not later
than 2 weeks after the alleged violation.
(5) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) Pay the civil penalty in accordance with instructions on the
citation; or
(ii) Elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.
(g) (1) A certificate alleging that a violation occurred, sworn to or affirmed by
a duly authorized law enforcement officer employed by or under contract with an agency,
based on the inspection of a recorded image, shall be evidence of the facts contained in the
certificate and shall be admissible in any proceeding concerning the alleged violation.
(2) Adjudication of liability shall be based on preponderance of the
evidence.
(h) (1) The District Court may consider in defense of a violation:
(i) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, that the motor vehicle
or registration plates of the motor vehicle were stolen before the violation occurred and
were not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation;
(ii) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, evidence that the
person named in the citation was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; and
(iii) Any other issues and evidence that the District Court considers
pertinent.
(2) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle or the registration plates were
stolen before the violation occurred and were not under the control or possession of the
owner at the time of the violation, the owner must submit proof that a police report about
the stolen motor vehicle or registration plates was filed in a timely manner.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 557
(3) To satisfy the evidentiary burden under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the person named in the citation shall provide to the District Court evidence to
the satisfaction of the District Court of who was operating the vehicle at the time of the
violation, including, at a minimum, the operator’s name and current address.
(4) (i) The provisions of this paragraph apply only to a citation that
involves a Class E (truck) vehicle with a registered gross weight of 26,001 pounds or more,
Class F (tractor) vehicle, Class G (trailer) vehicle operated in combination with a Class F
(tractor) vehicle, or Class P (passenger bus) vehicle.
(ii) To satisfy the evidentiary burden under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the person named in a citation described under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph may provide to the District Court a letter, sworn to or affirmed by the person
and mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, that:
1. States that the person named in the citation was not
operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; and
2. Provides the name, address, and driver’s license
identification number of the person who was operating the vehicle at the time of the
violation.
(5) (i) If the District Court finds that the person named in the citation
was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation or receives evidence under
paragraph (4)(ii)2 of this subsection identifying the person driving the vehicle at the time
of the violation, the clerk of court shall provide to the agency issuing the citation a copy of
any evidence substantiating who was operating the vehicle at the time of the violation.
(ii) On receipt of substantiating evidence from the District Court
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the agency may issue a citation as provided in
subsection (f) of this section to the person who the evidence indicates was operating the
vehicle at the time of the violation.
(iii) A citation issued under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall
be mailed not later than 2 weeks after receipt of the evidence from the District Court.
(i) If the civil penalty is not paid and the violation is not contested, the
Administration may refuse to register or reregister or may suspend the registration of the
motor vehicle.
(j) A violation for which a civil penalty is imposed under this section:
(1) Is not a moving violation for the purpose of assessing points under §
16–402 of this article and may not be recorded by the Administration on the driving record
of the owner or driver of the vehicle; and
– 7 –

Ch. 557 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) May not be considered in the provision of motor vehicle insurance
coverage.
(k) (1) In consultation with law enforcement agencies, the Chief Judge of the
District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, trials for violations, and
the collection of civil penalties imposed under this section.
(2) The standards and requirements for the use, processing, and disposal
of recorded images and associated data established under § 12–113.1 of this article apply
to citations issued under this section.
(l) (1) An agency or an agent or a contractor designated by the agency shall
administer and process civil citations issued under this section in coordination with the
District Court.
(2) If a contractor in any manner operates a stop sign monitoring system
or administers or processes citations generated by a stop sign monitoring system on behalf
of a local jurisdiction, the contractor’s fee may not be contingent on a per–ticket basis on
the number of citations issued or paid.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2028, the City of Gaithersburg and the City of Rockville, respectively, shall each report to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on:
(1) through October 1, 2028:
(i) the time period during which stop sign monitoring systems were
in use in the local jurisdiction; and
(ii) the number of warnings and citations issued as a result of
violations recorded by a stop sign monitoring system in the local jurisdiction over the
reported time period, by location and date;
(2) (i) the costs associated with implementing and operating stop sign
monitoring systems; and
(ii) the revenue collected on a monthly basis as a result of violations
recorded by stop sign monitoring systems;
(3) appropriate locations for the deployment of stop sign monitoring
systems;
(4) the performance and reliability of stop sign monitoring systems used by
the local jurisdiction; and
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 557
(5) the effectiveness of stop sign monitoring systems in reducing violations,
crashes, and pedestrian injuries in the local jurisdiction generally and in areas where the
stop sign monitoring systems were implemented and used.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 9 –